Washington statutes.
RCW 11.98.145

Distribution upon termination.

(1) Upon termination or partial termination of a trust, the trustee may send, by personal service, certified mail with return receipt requested, or in an electronic transmission if there is a consent of the recipient to electronic transmission then in effect under the terms of RCW 11.96A.110, to the beneficiaries a proposed plan to distribute existing trust assets. The right of any beneficiary to object to the plan to distribute existing trust assets, including the right to object to nonpro rata distributions authorized under RCW 11.98.070(15), terminates if the beneficiary does not notify the trustee of an objection within thirty days after the proposal was sent but only if the proposal informed the beneficiary of the right to object and of the time allowed for objection.

(2) Upon the occurrence of an event terminating or partially terminating a trust, the trustee shall proceed expeditiously to distribute the trust property to the persons entitled to it, subject to the right of the trustee to retain a reasonable reserve for the payment of debts, expenses, and taxes.

[ 2011 c 327 s 27.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—2011 c 327: See notes following RCW 11.103.020.